sv: Aida-tyg i färdigskuret format: Klipps på beställning (efter längd); Färdigklippt bit; Rulle/bal; Övrigt
cs: Předřezaný formát látky Aida: Uříznuto na míru (podle délky); Předem ustřižený kus; Role/návin; Ostatní
ru: Формат предварительно нарезанной ткани Аида: Отрез на заказ (по длине); Готовый отрез; Рулон/рулонная ткань; Другое
nb: Aida-stoff forhåndskåret format: Kappet på bestilling (etter lengde); Forhåndsklippet stykke; Rull / stoffrull; Annet
nl: Aida-stof, voorgesneden formaat: Op maat gesneden (op lengte); Voorgesneden stuk; Rol/stofrol; Overig
es: Formato de precorte de la tela Aida: Corte a medida (por longitud); Pieza precortada; Rollo/pieza; Otro
ro-RO: Format pretăiat pentru pânza Aida: Tăiere la comandă (în funcție de lungime); Bucată pretăiată; Rulou/Balot; Altele
zh-TW: 愛達布預先裁剪格式: 依訂單裁剪 (按長度); 預裁布塊; 捲/匹; 其他
hr-HR: Unaprijed izrezani format platna aida: Rezanje po narudžbi (po duljini); Unaprijed izrezan komad; Rola / bala; Ostalo
pl: Format wstępnie dociętej kanwy: Cięte na zamówienie (na metry); Wstępnie przycięty kawałek; Rolka/bela; Inne
bg-BG: Предварително изрязан формат за плат Aida: Рязане по поръчка (на дължина); Предварително изрязано парче; Ролка/топче; Други
pt-PT: Formato do tecido Aida pré-cortado: Corte por encomenda (por comprimento); Peça pré-cortada; Rolo/peça; Outro
fr: Format de découpe de la toile Aïda: Coupe à la commande (à la longueur); Pièce prédécoupée; Rouleau/pièce; Autre
tr: Aida kumaşı ön kesim formatı: Siparişe göre kesim (uzunluğa göre); Önceden kesilmiş parça; Rulo/Top; Diğer
pt-BR: Formato pré-cortado do tecido Aida: Corte sob medida (por comprimento); Peça pré-cortada; Rolo/Peça; Outros
vi: Định dạng cắt sẵn vải Aida: Cắt theo yêu cầu (theo chiều dài); Mảnh cắt sẵn; Cuộn/Súc; Khác
da: Aida-stof i forudskåret format: Skåret på bestilling (efter længde); Forskåret stykke; Rulle/stofrulle; Andet
it: Tessuto Aida pretagliato: Tagliata su misura (per lunghezza); Pezzo pretagliato; Rotolo/Bobina; Altro
sl-SI: Prednarezana oblika tkanina Aida: Odrezano po naročilu (po dolžini); Vnaprej odrezan kos; Rola/bala; Drugo
lt-LT: Iš anksto sukirptos „Aida“ audinio juostelės: Pjaunama pagal užsakymą (pagal ilgį); Iš anksto atpjautas gabalas; Ritinys; Kita
en: Aida cloth pre-cut format: Cut-to-order (by length); Pre-cut piece; Roll/Bolt; Other
ko: 아이다 원단 재단 형태: 주문 재단(길이별); 사전 재단 조각; 롤/볼트; 기타
ja: アイーダ布のプレカットフォーマット: オーダーカット (長さ指定); カット済み; ロール/反物; その他
sk-SK: Predrezaný formát látky Aida: Rezané na objednávku (podľa dĺžky); Predrezaný kus; Rolka/balík; Iné
de: Vorgeschnittenes Aida-Tuch: Zuschnitt auf Bestellung (nach Länge); Zugeschnittenes Stück; Rolle/Ballen; Andere
fi: Aida-kankaan leikkausmuoto: Tilaustyönä leikattu (pituuden mukaan); Valmiiksi leikattu pala; Rulla/pakka; Muu
zh-CN: 阿依达布预裁切形式: 按订单裁剪（按长度）; 预裁剪片; 卷/匹; 其他
hu: Aida-kendő előre vágott formátumban: Méretre vágott (hossz alapján); Előre vágott darab; Tekercs/vég; Egyéb
el: Ύφασμα Aida σε προ-κομμένη μορφή: Κοπή κατά παραγγελία (βάσει μήκους); Προκομμένο κομμάτι; Ρολό/Τόπι; Άλλο
th: รูปแบบผ้า Aida ที่จำหน่าย: ตัดตามสั่ง (ตามความยาว); ชิ้นที่ตัดไว้แล้ว; ม้วน/พับ; อื่นๆ